Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB107.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 5705 of Title 3 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 5705. [(Reserved).] Food allergy awareness program.(a) Establishment.--The Department of Health shall establish a food allergy awareness program. The food allergy awareness program shall requ ire a p ublic eating or drinking place to comply with all of the following:(1) Designate a manager who is knowledgeable regarding issues concerning food allergies and food preparation.(2) Require each food employee to review the materials provided under subsection (b) on food allergy issues.(b) Materials.--The Department of Health shall prepare and provide written and video materials on food allergy issues to a 123456789101112131415161718 p ublic eating or drinking place for review by each food employee as required under subsection (a)(2).(c) Licensure requirements.--Each licensor, in collaboration with the Department of Health, shall require a minimum knowledge of food allergy issues as a condition for licensure under section 5703 (relating to license required).Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0107PN0060 - 2 - 1234567